Louisiana, session 2026, SB150.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:42.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§42.1. Scanning of original supporting documents and creation of electronic
files; issuance of certified copies of evidentiary documents
A. The vital records registry and the state registrar may scan original
documents submitted in support of vital records applications and in
substantiation of information contained in the vital records registry,
electronically store the scanned original documents, and return the original
documents to the submitter. The scanned and electronically stored originals
shall have the same authenticity as the original documents.
B. The vital records registry and the state registrar may issue certified
copies of documents in their custody in paper or electronic form, including but
not limited to those that are evidentiary in nature.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 150 ENROLLED
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.